Maryland, session 2026, SB0057.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
6–101.2.
(A) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ESTABLISH A PROCESS TO INCLUDE A
NOTATION INDICATING VETERAN STATUS ON A LICENSE OR PUBLIC PROFILE.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0057*

SENATE BILL 57
(B) IF THE DEPARTMENT ESTABLISHES THE PROCESS DESCRIBED IN
SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION, AN APPLICATION FOR A LICENSE SHALL ALLOW
AN APPLICANT TO:
(1) PRESENT A CERTIFICATION OF VETERAN STATUS OBTAINED
FROM THE DEPARTMENT OF VETERANS AND MILITARY FAMILIES IN ACCORDANCE
WITH § 9–905 OF THE STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, A DD FORM 214, OR OTHER
DOCUMENTATION ACCEPTABLE TO THE DEPARTMENT CERTIFYING VETERAN
STATUS; AND
(2) INDICATE THAT THE APPLICANT CONSENTS TO:
(I) HAVING A NOTATION ON THE APPLICANT’S LICENSE OR
PUBLIC PROFILE INDICATING THAT THE APPLICANT IS A VETERAN; AND
(II) BEING CONTACTED BY APPROPRIATE EXECUTIVE BRANCH
AGENCIES REGARDING THE APPLICANT’S ELIGIBILITY FOR STATE OR FEDERAL
VETERANS BENEFITS.
(C) IF AN APPLICANT PRESENTS THE REQUIRED DOCUMENTATION AND
CONSENTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION, THE
DEPARTMENT SHALL:
(1) INCLUDE ON THE APPLICANT’S LICENSE OR PUBLIC PROFILE A
NOTATION INDICATING THAT THE APPLICANT IS A VETERAN; AND
(2) IN ACCORDANCE WITH §§ 4–304 THROUGH 4–325 OF THE
GENERAL PROVISIONS ARTICLE AND ANY OTHER APPLICABLE LAW, AND ON
REQUEST FROM AN EXECUTIVE BRANCH AGENCY, ELECTRONICALLY TRANSMIT TO
THE EXECUTIVE BRANCH AGENCY APPROPRIATE INFORMATION ABOUT THE
APPLICANT.
(D) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THIS
SECTION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.